src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun morphological lexica 

* **LEXICON Vocative**

* **LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-OM** is to provide deverbal nouns with +Der/ӧм tags

* **LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-AN**

* **LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-YSJ**

Basic nouns.

The lexicon for basic nouns is ` N_ `

This should be phased out 2013-05-07

subsequent Cns vs Vow
* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC  
* LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC  

* LEXICON N-RELAT_PARAGOGIC-V/L  ныв:ны нылыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  ныв:ны нылыс
* LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-V/L  ныв:ны нылыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-J  ав:ав авйыс
* LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-J  ав:ав авйыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-K  пос:пос поскыс
* LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-K  пос:пос поскыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-M  зон:зон зонмыс
* LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-M  зон:зон зонмыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-T  зеп:зеп зептыс
* LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC-T  зеп:зеп зептыс

* LEXICON N_END-IN-DD1  гадь:гад гаддьыс
* LEXICON NMN_END-IN-DD1  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс

* LEXICON N_END-IN-DDZ  кыдз:кыд
* LEXICON NMN_END-IN-DDZ  кыдз:кыд

* LEXICON N_END-IN-LL1  моль:мол молльӧ
* LEXICON NMN_END-IN-LL1  моль:мол молльӧ

* LEXICON N-RELAT_END-IN-J  абай:аба абайыс
* LEXICON N_END-IN-J  абай:аба абайыс
* LEXICON N-0_END-IN-J  абай:аба абайыс

* LEXICON N-RELAT_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  водз:водз
* LEXICON N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  водз:водз
* LEXICON NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  водз:водз

* LEXICON N-RELAT_END-IN-Ь  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
* LEXICON N_END-IN-Ь  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
* LEXICON N-0_END-IN-Ь  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed

## Inflectional lexica

All nouns follow one contlex "N_"
to begin with here is simply a list of all variant
with no more variants beyond:

* **LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX**

SG1

SG2

SG3

PL1

PL2

PL3

SG1
SG2
SG3
PL1
PL2
PL3

SG1
SG2
SG3
PL1
PL2
PL3

SG1

SG2

SG3

PL1

PL2

PL3

## Case

+Der/а+Adv:%>а K ;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-kpv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
